Maryland, session 2026, HB0023.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
12–301.
(a) (1) On application, the Administration shall issue an identification card to
any applicant who:
[(1)] (I) Is a resident of this State;
[(2)] (II) Does not have a driver’s license;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0023*

HOUSE BILL 23
[(3)] (III) Presents a birth certificate or other proof of age and identity
acceptable to the Administration;
[(4)] (IV) Provides satisfactory documentary evidence that the applicant
has lawful status;
[(5) (i)] (V) 1. Provides satisfactory documentary evidence that
the applicant has a valid Social Security number by presenting the applicant’s Social
Security Administration account card or, if the Social Security Administration account card
is not available, any of the following documents bearing the applicant’s Social Security
number:
[1.] A. A current W–2 form;
[2.] B. A current SSA–1099 form;
[3.] C. A current non–SSA–1099 form; or
[4.] D. A current pay stub with the applicant’s name and
Social Security number on it; or
[(ii)] 2. Provides satisfactory documentary evidence that the
applicant is not eligible for a Social Security number; and
[(6)] (VI) Presents a completed application for an identification card on a
form furnished by the Administration.
(2) THE ADMINISTRATION MAY NOT REQUIRE A PARENT OR LEGAL
GUARDIAN OF A MINOR AT LEAST 15 YEARS OF AGE TO COSIGN OR BE PRESENT AT
THE TIME OF SUBMISSION OF THE MINOR’S APPLICATION FOR AN IDENTIFICATION
CARD.
(3) (I) THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS
ESTABLISHING ACCEPTABLE FORMS OF DOCUMENTATION ESTABLISHING PROOF OF
RESIDENCY THAT A MINOR AT LEAST 15 YEARS OF AGE MAY USE IN AN APPLICATION
FOR AN IDENTIFICATION CARD, INCLUDING:
1. SCHOOL ENROLLMENT RECORDS, REPORT CARDS, OR
TRANSCRIPTS ISSUED BY A PUBLIC OR PRIVATE SCHOOL;
2. DOCUMENTATION FROM A HOMELESS SERVICES
PROVIDER, SHELTER, OR SOCIAL SERVICES AGENCY THAT VERIFIES RESIDENCY;
3. COURT DOCUMENTS;

HOUSE BILL 23 3
4. CHILD WELFARE AGENCY RECORDS;
5. HEALTH INSURANCE DOCUMENTS;
6. IF ACCOMPANIED BY SUFFICIENT DOCUMENTATION
ESTABLISHING PROOF OF THE ADULT’S RESIDENCE, A NOTARIZED AFFIDAVIT
SIGNED BY AN ADULT WITH WHOM THE MINOR RESIDES ATTESTING TO THE MINOR’S
RESIDENCY; OR
7. ANY OTHER DOCUMENT THAT THE ADMINISTRATION
DETERMINES APPROPRIATE.
(II) IF A MINOR AT LEAST 15 YEARS OF AGE IS UNABLE TO
PROVIDE DOCUMENTATION THAT SATISFIES THE REQUIREMENTS OF THE FEDERAL
REAL ID ACT, THE ADMINISTRATION MAY ISSUE AN IDENTIFICATION CARD THAT
IS NOT COMPLIANT WITH THE FEDERAL REAL ID ACT.
(III) THIS PARAGRAPH MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO LIMIT THE
ADMINISTRATION’S AUTHORITY TO REQUIRE DOCUMENTATION NECESSARY TO
COMPLY WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF THE FEDERAL REAL ID ACT, INCLUDING
DOCUMENTATION ESTABLISHING PROOF OF RESIDENCY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.